Washington statutes.
RCW 23.95.205

Forms.

(1) The secretary of state may provide forms for entity filings required or permitted to be made by Title 23, 23B, 24, or 25 RCW, but, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, their use is not required.

(2) The secretary of state may require that a cover sheet for an entity filing and an annual report be on forms prescribed by the secretary of state.

[ 2015 c 176 s 1202.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.